Louisiana, session 2026, HB874.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:707.2(C)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§707.2. Electronic media system for lien recordation and title information; vehicle
titling and registration; participation requirements; fees; required bond;
confidentiality of information; rules and regulations
* * *
C.(1)
* * *
(2) Each federally insured depository institution that originates more than
two hundred fifty motor vehicle transactions per year, and each finance company,
lending institution, or other lender shall designate a public tag agent with which such
bank, finance company, lending institution, or other lender shall interface its
computer system for the purpose of receiving electronic confirmation from the
department, of the receipt and the filing of the security interest on the subject motor
vehicle. Each federally insured depository institution that originates more than two
hundred fifty motor vehicle transactions per year, and each finance company, lending
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 874 ENROLLED
institution, or other lender shall also designate such public tag agent when
transmitting a release or satisfaction of its lien.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 39:17.2(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§17.2. Digitized credentials; authorization; implementation; validity
A.(1) Any credential authorized or required by the state may be made
available in digitized format on a program which a user can utilize through an
electronic wallet.
(2) The commissioner of administration may coordinate with the governing
bodies of the professions and occupations listed below to implement the availability
of digitized credentials:
(a) The Louisiana State Bar Association for the inclusion of bar membership
cards.
(b) The Louisiana High School Athletic Association for the inclusion of a
referee credential.
(c) Public and private universities and colleges in Louisiana for the inclusion
of faculty, staff, and student credentials.
(d) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, for the inclusion of mobility impaired identification cards.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.